Hawaii, session 2026, HB603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§10-     Native Hawaiian marketing program; marketing label.  (a)  The office shall administer and oversee a Native Hawaiian marketing program to promote businesses owned by indigenous Native Hawaiians through marketing and technical assistance. (b)  The office shall establish qualifications for participation in the Native Hawaiian marketing program. (c)  The office shall design and publish a marketing label that may be used by native Hawaiian businesses who qualify to participate in the native Hawaiian marketing program pursuant to subsection (b). (d)  The office shall provide marketing assistance and technical support for native Hawaiian businesses participating in the native Hawaiian marketing program to help the businesses grow and scale, including through the establishment of a directory on the office's official website of all participating native Hawaiian businesses. (e)  No person shall keep, offer, display or expose for sale, or solicit for the sale of, any item, service, product, souvenir, or other merchandise that: (1)  Is labeled using the marketing label published pursuant to subsection (b); or (2)  By any other means, represents the origin of the item as a service of or being produced by a native Hawaiian, if it has not been manufactured, assembled, fabricated, or produced by, or is not a service of, a Native Hawaiian business participating in the Native Hawaiian marketing program pursuant to this section. (f)  The office shall develop rules pursuant to chapter 91 to administer the Native Hawaiian marketing program." SECTION 2.  The office of Hawaiian affairs shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027 on the status of the Native Hawaiian marketing program established pursuant to this Act. The report shall include: (1)  The final design of the marketing label used to promote Native Hawaiian businesses as part of the program and what qualifications are required to participate in the program and use the label; (2)  Outcomes of how the marketing label is being used and how many businesses are using the marketing label; (3)  Any other relevant data; and (4)  Any proposed legislation. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $350,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Native Hawaiian marketing program established pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of Hawaiian affairs for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________